Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.432

Professional learning—Standards.

Standards for professional learning provide guidance on the preparation and delivery of high quality professional learning to those responsible for planning, facilitating, and sponsoring professional learning.

(1) Content standards. High quality professional learning:

(a) Includes clear goals and objectives relevant to desired student outcomes; and

(b) Aligns with state, district, school, and educator goals or priorities.

(2) Process standards. High quality professional learning:

(a) Is designed and based upon the analysis of data relevant to the identified goals, objectives, and audience;

(b) Is assessed to determine that it is meeting the targeted goals and objectives;

(c) Promotes collaboration among educators to encourage sharing of ideas and working together to achieve the identified goals and objectives;

(d) Advances an educator's ability to apply acquired knowledge and skills from the professional learning to specific content; and

(e) Models good pedagogical practice and applies knowledge of adult learning theory to engage educators.

(3) Context standards. High quality professional learning:

(a) Makes use of relevant resources to ensure the identified goals and objectives are met;

(b) Is facilitated by a professional knowledgeable about the identified objectives; and

(c) Is designed in such a way that sessions connect and build upon each other to provide a coherent and useful learning experience for educators.

[ 2016 c 77 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.300.602.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2016 c 77: See note following RCW 28A.415.430.